Utah statutes.
59-7-320.   Equitable adjustment of standard allocation or apportionment.
Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the allocation and
apportionment provisions of this part do not fairly represent the extent of
the taxpayer's business activity in this state, the taxpayer may petition for
or the commission may require, in respect to all or any part of the taxpayer's
business activity, if reasonable:
(1)  separate accounting;
(2)  the exclusion of any one or more of the factors;
(3)  the inclusion of one or more additional factors which will fairly
represent the taxpayer's business activity in this state; or
(4)  the employment of any other method to effectuate an equitable allocation
and apportionment of the taxpayer's income.
